Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1357.10a of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The sale of firearms shall be exempt from the tax imposed by


Section 1354 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes if the sale takes


place during the month of July.


B. As used in this section, “firearm” means a gun, rifle,


pistol, or shotgun.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2368 QD 12/18/2025 7:05:56 PM





Req. No. 2368 Page 1